pt-PT: Extrusora de massa com disco de forma incluída: Animais; Círculos; Fitas planas; Flores; Corações; Tubo oco; Letras; Formas mistas/sortidas; Massa/fios grossos; Números; Formas sazonais; Esparguete/fios; Quadrados; Estrelas; Triângulos; Outro
de: Enthaltene Formscheiben für den Teigextruder: Tiere; Kreise; Flache Bänder; Blumen; Herzen; Hohlrohr; Buchstaben; Gemischte/sortierte Formen; Nudeln/Dicke Stränge; Zahlen; Saisonale Formen; Spaghetti/Stränge; Quadrate; Sterne; Dreiecke; Sonstige
cs: Extruder na těsto, disk tvarů je součástí balení: Zvířata; Kruhy; Ploché pásky; Květiny; Srdce; Dutá trubička; Písmena; Smíšené/různé tvary; Nudle / silné prameny; Čísla; Sezónní tvary; Špagety/prameny; Čtverce; Hvězdy; Trojúhelníky; Jiné
hu: A mellékelt tészta extruder formázó tárcsa: Állatok; Körök; Lapos szalagok; Virágok; Szívek; Üreges cső; Betűk; Vegyes/különféle formák; Tészta/vastag szálak; Számok; Szezonális formák; Spagetti/szálak; Négyzetek; Csillagok; Háromszögek; Egyéb
da: Medfølgende formskive til udtrækkeren: Dyr; Cirkler; Flade bånd; Blomster; Hjerter; Hult rør; Bogstaver; Blandede/forskellige former; Nudler/tykke strimler; Tal; Sæsonprægede former; Spaghetti/strimler; Firkanter; Stjerner; Trekanter; Andet
nb: Deigekstruder former inkludert: Dyr; Sirkler; Flate bånd; Blomster; Hjerter; Hult rør; Bokstaver; Blandede/assorterte former; Nudler/tykke tråder; Tall; Sesongbaserte former; Spaghetti/tråder; Firkanter; Stjerner; Trekanter; Annet
lt-LT: Įtrauktas tešlos ekstruderio formavimo diskas: Gyvūnai; Apskritimai; Plokščios juostelės; Gėlės; Širdelės; Tuščiaviduris vamzdelis; Raidės; Mišrios / įvairios formos; Makaronai / storos gijos; Skaičiai; Sezoninės formos; Spagečiai / gijos; Kvadratai; Žvaigždės; Trikampiai; Kita
ko: 반죽 압출기 모양 디스크 포함 여부: 동물; 원형; 플랫 리본; 꽃; 하트; 할로우 튜브; 문자; 혼합/다양한 모양; 국수/굵은 가닥; 숫자; 시즌 모양; 스파게티/가닥; 정사각형; 별; 삼각형; 기타
en: Dough extruder shape disc included: Animals; Circles; Flat ribbons; Flowers; Hearts; Hollow tube; Letters; Mixed/assorted shapes; Noodles/thick strands; Numbers; Seasonal shapes; Spaghetti/strands; Squares; Stars; Triangles; Other
nl: Deegextruder vormschijf inbegrepen: Dieren; Cirkels; Platte linten; Bloemen; Harten; Holle buis; Letters; Gemengde/diverse vormen; Noedels/dikke slierten; Cijfers; Seizoensvormen; Spaghetti/slierten; Vierkanten; Sterren; Driehoeken; Overige
zh-TW: 麵團擠出器隨附造型盤: 動物; 圓形; 扁平緞帶形; 花朵; 心形; 空心管形; 字母; 混合/各式形狀; 麵條/粗絲形; 數字; 季節性形狀; 義大利麵/細絲形; 方形; 星形; 三角形; 其他
sl-SI: Vključeni oblikovalni diski za ekstruder testa: Živali; Krogi; Ploski trakovi; Rože; Srčki; Votla cev; Črke; Mešane oblike; Rezanci/debeli prameni; Številke; Sezonske oblike; Špageti/prameni; Kvadrati; Zvezde; Trikotniki; Drugo
sk-SK: Tvarovací kotúč zariadenia na vytláčanie cesta je súčasťou balenia: Zvieratá; Kruhy; Ploché stužky; Kvety; Srdcia; Dutá trubička; Písmená; Zmiešané/rôzne tvary; Rezance/hrubé pramene; Čísla; Sezónne tvary; Špagety/pramene; Štvorce; Hviezdy; Trojuholníky; Iné
th: รวมแผ่นดิสก์รูปทรงเครื่องอัดแป้ง: รูปสัตว์; วงกลม; ริบบิ้นแบน; ดอกไม้; หัวใจ; ท่อกลวง; ตัวอักษร; คละทรง; เส้นบะหมี่/เส้นหนา; ตัวเลข; ทรงตามเทศกาล; เส้นสปาเกตตี/เส้นบาง; สี่เหลี่ยมจัตุรัส; ดาว; สามเหลี่ยม; อื่นๆ
es: Disco de forma incluido para extrusora de masa: Animales; Círculos; Cintas planas; Flores; Corazones; Tubo hueco; Letras; Formas mixtas/variadas; Fideos/tiras gruesas; Números; Formas de temporada; Espagueti/tiras; Cuadrados; Estrellas; Triángulos; Otro
hr-HR: Ekstruder za tijesto, s uključenim diskom za oblik: Životinje; Krugovi; Ravne trake; Cvjetovi; Srca; Šuplja cijev; Slova; Miješani / razni oblici; Rezanci / debele niti; Brojevi; Sezonski oblici; Špageti/niti; Kvadrati; Zvijezde; Trokuti; Ostalo
vi: Đĩa tạo hình bột đi kèm: Động vật; Hình tròn; Dải dẹt; Hoa; Trái tim; Ống rỗng; Chữ cái; Hình dạng hỗn hợp; Sợi mì/sợi dày; Chữ số; Hình dạng theo mùa; Sợi spaghetti; Hình vuông; Ngôi sao; Hình tam giác; Khác
pl: Tarcze z kształtami dołączone do wyciskarki do masy: Zwierzęta; Koła; Płaskie wstążki; Kwiaty; Serca; Pusta rurka; Litery; Mieszane/różne kształty; Kluski/grube wstążki; Cyfry; Kształty sezonowe; Spaghetti/wstążki; Kwadraty; Gwiazdy; Trójkąty; Inne
ja: 生地押し出し機Shapesディスク付き: 動物; 円形; フラットリボン; 花; ハート; 中空チューブ; 文字; ミックス/アソート形状; 麺/太いひも; 数字; 季節の形; スパゲッティ/ひも; 四角形; 星; 三角形; その他
ru: Форма дисков экструдера для теста: Животные; Круги; Плоские ленты; Цветы; Сердца; Полые трубки; Буквы; Смешанные формы/ассорти; Лапша/толстые нити; Цифры; Сезонные формы; Спагетти/нити; Квадраты; Звезды; Треугольники; Другое
it: Estrusore per impasti. Disco Shapes incluso.: Animali; Cerchi; Nastri piatti; Fiori; Cuori; Tubo vuoto; Lettere; Forme miste/assortite; Noodle/fili spessi; Numeri; Forme stagionali; Spaghetti/fili; Quadrati; Stelle; Triangoli; Altro
pt-BR: Disco modelador incluído para extrusora de massa: Animais; Círculos; Fitas planas; Flores; Corações; Tubo oco; Letras; Formas mistas/variadas; Macarrão/fios grossos; Números; Formas sazonais; Espaguete/fios; Quadrados; Estrelas; Triângulos; Outros
bg-BG: Включен диск за форми на екструдера за тесто: Животни; Кръгове; Плоски ленти; Цветя; Сърца; Куха тръба; Букви; Смесени/различни форми; Макарони/дебели нишки; Цифри; Сезонни форми; Спагети/нишки; Квадрати; Звезди; Триъгълници; Друго
el: Περιλαμβάνεται δίσκος σχημάτων συσκευή εξώθησης ζύμης: Ζώα; Κύκλοι; Επίπεδες κορδέλες; Λουλούδια; Καρδιές; Κοίλος σωλήνας; Γράμματα; Ανάμεικτα/διάφορα σχήματα; Νουντλς/χοντρές λωρίδες; Αριθμοί; Εποχιακά σχήματα; Σπαγγέτι/λωρίδες; Τετράγωνα; Αστέρια; Τρίγωνα; Άλλο
fi: Taikinapuristimen mukana toimitetut muotit: Eläimet; Ympyrät; Litteät nauhat; Kukat; Sydämet; Ontto putki; Kirjaimet; Erilaisia muotoja; Nuudelit / paksut säikeet; Numerot; Kausimuodot; Spagetti/säikeet; Neliöt; Tähdet; Kolmiot; Muu
tr: Hamur şekillendirme diski dahil: Hayvanlar; Daireler; Yassı şeritler; Çiçekler; Kalpler; İçi boş boru; Harfler; Karışık/çeşitli şekiller; Erişte/kalın şeritler; Sayılar; Mevsime özel şekiller; Spagetti/şeritler; Kareler; Yıldızlar; Üçgenler; Diğer
sv: Degextruderns formskivor ingår: Djur; Cirklar; Platta band; Blommor; Hjärtan; Ihåligt rör; Bokstäver; Blandade/sorterade former; Nudlar/tjocka strängar; Siffror; Säsongsformer; Spagetti/strängar; Fyrkanter; Stjärnor; Trianglar; Övrigt
fr: Plaque de forme incluse pour extrudeuse de pâte: Animaux; Cercles; Rubans plats; Fleurs; Cœurs; Tube creux; Lettres; Formes mixtes/assorties; Nouilles/brins épais; Chiffres; Formes de saison; Spaghettis/brins; Carrés; Étoiles; Triangles; Autre
zh-CN: 含面团挤出成型盘: 动物; 圆形; 扁平带状; 花朵; 心形; 空心管状; 字母; 混合/各种形状; 面条/粗条状; 数字; 季节性形状; 意大利面/细条状; 方形; 星形; 三角形; 其他
ro-RO: Disc de modelare pentru extruderul de aluat – inclus: Animale; Cercuri; Panglici plate; Flori; Inimi; Tub gol; Litere; Forme mixte/asortate; Tăiței/fire groase; Numere; Forme de sezon; Spaghete/fire; Pătrate; Stele; Triunghiuri; Altele